Utah statutes.
26-45-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Blood relative"  means a person's biologically related:

(a)  parent;

(b)  grandparent;

(c)  child;

(d)  grandchild;

(e)  sibling;

(f)  uncle;

(g)  aunt;

(h)  nephew;

(i)  niece; or

(j)  first cousin.

(2)  "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid, ribonucleic acid, and chromosomes, which may be analyzed to detect heritable diseases or conditions, including the identification of carriers, predicting risk of disease, or establishing a clinical diagnosis.

(3)  "DNA sample" means any human biological specimen from which DNA can be extracted, or DNA extracted from such specimen.

(4) (a)  "Genetic analysis" or "genetic test" means the testing or analysis of an identifiable individual's DNA that results in information that is derived from the presence, absence, alteration, or mutation of an inherited gene or genes, or the presence or absence of a specific DNA marker or markers.

(b)  "Genetic analysis" or "genetic test" does not mean:

(i)  a routine physical examination;

(ii)  a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis;

(iii)  a test to identify the presence of drugs or HIV infection; or

(iv)  a test performed due to the presence of signs, symptoms, or other manifestations of a disease, illness, impairment, or other disorder.

(5)  "Individual" means the person from whose body the DNA sample originated.

(6)  "Person" means any person, organization, or entity other than the individual.

(7) (a)  "Private genetic information" means any information about an identifiable individual that is derived from the presence, absence, alteration, or mutation of an inherited gene or genes, or the presence or absence of a specific DNA marker or markers, and which has been obtained:

(i)  from a genetic test or analysis of the individual's DNA; or

(ii)  from a genetic test or analysis of a person's DNA to whom the individual is a blood relative.

(b)  "Private genetic information" does not include information that is derived from:

(i)  a routine physical examination;

(ii)  a routine chemical, blood, or urine analysis;

(iii)  a test to identify the presence of drugs or HIV infection; or

(iv)  a test performed due to the presence of signs, symptoms, or other manifestations of a disease, illness, impairment, or other disorder.

